de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Werkzeugzubehör > Bohrzubehör > Bohrerschleifgeräte: Manuelle Schärfer; Elektrische Schärfer
da: Isenkram > Værktøj – tilbehør > Bor – tilbehør > Borebit – slibere: Manuelle slibere; Eldrevne slibere
sk-SK: Náradie > Náradie a príslušenstvo > Príslušenstvo k vŕtačkám a skrutkovačom > Brúsky na vrtáky: Ručné brúsky; Elektrické brúsky
hr-HR: Željezarija > Dodaci za alat > Pribor za bušilice i odvijače > Oštrila za svrdla: Ručna oštrila; Električna oštrila
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Įrankių priedai > Gręžtuvų ir atsuktuvų priedai > Grąžtų galąstuvai: Rankiniai galąstuvai; Elektriniai galąstuvai
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Аксессуары для инструментов > Аксессуары для дрелей и шуруповертов > Инструменты для заточки сверл: Насадки для заточки сверл; Станки для заточки сверл
pt-BR: Ferragens > Acessórios para ferramentas > Acessórios para furadeiras > Afiadores de brocas: Afiadores manuais; Afiadores elétricos
fi: Rakentaminen > Työkalujen lisätarvikkeet > Poran ja ruuvinvääntimen lisätarvikkeet > Poranterien teroittimet: Manuaaliset teroittimet; Sähköteroittimet
vi: Phần cứng > Phụ kiện dụng cụ > Phụ kiện máy khoan và tua vít > Dụng cụ mài mũi khoan: Dụng cụ mài thủ công; Dụng cụ mài
es: Bricolaje > Accesorios para herramientas > Accesorios para taladros y destornilladores > Afiladores para brocas: Afiladores manuales; Afiladores eléctricos
en: Hardware > Tool Accessories > Drill & Screwdriver Accessories > Drill Bit Sharpeners: Manual Sharpeners; Power Sharpeners
bg-BG: Железария > Аксесоари за инструменти > Аксесоари за бормашини и винтоверти > Точила за свредла: Ръчни точила; Електрически точила
zh-TW: 硬體 > 工具配件 > 電鑽/電動起子配件 > 鑽頭研磨機: 手動研磨機; 電動削尖器
pl: Sprzęt > Akcesoria do narzędzi > Akcesoria do wiercenia > Ostrzałki do wierteł: Ostrzałki ręczne; Ostrzałki elektryczne
ro-RO: Feronerie > Accesorii pentru unelte > Accesorii pentru burghie și șurubelnițe > Dispozitive de ascuțit burghie: Ascuțitori manuale; Ascuțitori cu alimentare
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Nástroje a nářadí – příslušenství > Příslušenství k vrtačkám > Ostřiče vrtáků: Ruční ostřiče; Elektrické ostřiče
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 工具配件 > 钻孔机/螺丝刀配件 > 钻头研磨机: 手动研磨机; 电动研磨机
tr: Hırdavat > Alet Aksesuarları > Matkap ve Tornavide Aksesuarları > Matkap Ucu Bileme Makineleri: Manuel Bileyiciler; Güç Bileyiciler
fr: Quincaillerie > Accessoires d’outils > Accessoires pour perceuses et visseuses > Affûteuses de forets: Affûteuses manuelles; Affûteurs électriques
sv: Metallprodukter > Verktygstillbehör > Tillbehör till borrmaskiner och skruvdragare > Borrslipmaskiner: Manuella slipmaskiner; Eldrivna slipare
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Gereedschapaccessoires > Booraccessoires > Boorslijpers: Handmatige slijpers; Elektrische slijpers
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Dodatki za orodje > Dodatki za vrtalnike in vijačnike > Brusilniki za svedre: Ročni brusilniki; Električni brusilniki
ko: 철물 > 공구 부대용품 > 드릴/스크루드라이버 부대용품 > 드릴날 연마기: 수동 연마기; 동력 샤프너
hu: Hardver > Szerszám-kiegészítők > Fúró és csavarhúzó kiegészítők > Fúróbit-élezők: Kézi élezők; Erőteljes élezők
ja: DIY用品 > 工具関連用品 > ドリル関連用品 > ドリル研磨機: 手動研磨機; パワー研磨機
nb: Maskinvare > Verktøytilbehør > Tilbehør for driller og skrutrekkere > Slipere for drillbits: Manuelle slipere; Elektriske slipere
pt-PT: Equipamento > Acessórios de ferramentas > Acessórios de berbequim e chave de fendas > Afiadores de pontas de berbequim: Afiadores manuais; Afiadores elétricos
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > อุปกรณ์เครื่องมือ > อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับสว่านและไขควง > ที่ลับดอกสว่าน: ที่ลับแบบแมนนวล; เครื่องลับไฟฟ้า
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Αξεσουάρ εργαλείων > Αξεσουάρ τρυπανιών & κατσαβιδιών > Ακονιστήρια για μύτες τρυπανιών: Χειροκίνητα ακονιστήρια; Ακονιστήρια ισχύος
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Accessori per attrezzi > Accessori per trapani e cacciavite > Affilatori per punte di trapano: Affilatori manuali; Affilatrici elettriche